Hawaii statutes.
§142-13 Reporting disease; penalty.
Any person knowing or having reason to believe that any animal on or about that
person's premises or the premises of another is affected with any infectious or
contagious disease who fails to promptly report the same to the department of
agriculture, shall be fined not less than $25 nor more than $500. [L 1884, c
29, pt of §2; am L 1905, c 81, §3; am L 1909, c 138, §1; RL 1925, §618; RL
1935, §213; RL 1945, §1063; RL 1955, §20-14; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L
1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-13; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 63, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next